Washington statutes.
RCW 40.10.020

Essential records—Reproduction and storage—Coordination of protection program—Fees.

The state archivist is authorized to reproduce those documents designated as essential records by the several elected and appointed officials of the state and local government by microfilm or other miniature photographic process and to assist and cooperate in the storage and safeguarding of such reproductions in such place as is recommended by the state archivist with the advice of the director of commerce. The state archivist shall coordinate the essential records protection program and shall carry out the provisions of the state emergency plan as they relate to the preservation of essential records. The state archivist is authorized to charge the several departments of the state and local government the actual cost incurred in reproducing, storing and safeguarding such documents: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall authorize the destruction of the originals of such documents after reproduction thereof.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2031; 1995 c 399 s 58; 1986 c 266 s 45; 1985 c 7 s 106; 1982 c 36 s 2; 1973 c 54 s 2; 1963 c 241 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.